Utah statutes.
9-4-624.   Property of authority exempt from levy and sale -- Obligees excepted -- Waiver.

(1)  All property, including funds, acquired or held by an authority pursuant to this part shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution.  An execution or other judicial process may not issue against the property and a judgment against the authority may not be a charge or lien upon the property.

(2)  This section does not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the authority on its rents, fees, or revenues or the right of the federal government to pursue any remedies conferred upon it pursuant to this part.

(3)  An authority may waive its exemption with respect to claims against any profit-making enterprise occupying any portion of a project if that waiver does not affect or impair the rights of any obligee of the authority.

